Wyoming, session 2025, HB0154.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-26-106(a)(iv) and (e) is amended
to read:

22-26-106. False voting.

(a) False voting consists of performing any of the
following acts in connection with or related to the
election process or an election:
HB0154

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0575

(iv) Voting, or offering to vote, more than once
in an election, including voting more than once in a
Wyoming election, or voting in any other state and then
voting, or offering to vote, in Wyoming for the same
federal election.

(e) The county sheriff shall investigate acts of
false voting at the request of the secretary of state or a
county clerk who has reasonable cause to believe that a
person has committed false voting. After an investigation
and a finding that the allegation has merit, the county
sheriff shall refer the matter to the district attorney for
prosecution in the appropriate courts of this state.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0154